Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.276

Gender-based violence—Sexual assault—Training curriculum requirements.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5356-S2.SL) ***

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the commission shall develop peace officer training on a victim-centered, trauma-informed approach to interacting with victims and responding to calls involving gender-based violence. The curriculum must: Be designed for deployment and use within individual law enforcement agencies; include features allowing for it to be used in different environments, which may include multimedia or video components; and allow for law enforcement agencies to host it in small segments at different times over several days or weeks, including roll calls. The training must include components on available resources for victims including, but not limited to, material on and references to community-based victim advocates.

(2) In developing the training, the commission shall seek advice from the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington coalition of sexual assault programs, and experts on sexual assault, gender-based violence, and the neurobiology of trauma.

(3) All peace officers shall complete the training under this section at least once every three years.

(4) With the exception of the state parks and recreation commission, the training requirements under this section do not apply to limited authority Washington law enforcement agencies as defined in RCW 10.93.020 whose authority does not include the investigation of sexual assaults.

[2023 c 197 s 4; 2023 c 168 s 4; 2017 c 290 s 5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2023 c 168 s 4 and by 2023 c 197 s 4, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2023 c 197 s 4: "Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [2023 c 197 s 12.]